Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-933
Sections; applicability.

The provisions of sections 19-930 to 19-932 shall not apply in a county within which the interjurisdictional planning commission would exercise jurisdiction if such county does not exercise the authority granted by section 23-114.

Laws 1993, LB 207, § 7.